Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1731
Roads along or across county line; discontinuance.

Roads established by the concurrent action of the county boards of two or more counties can be discontinued only by the concurrent action of the county boards of the several counties in which the same may be situated; but such roads shall be treated in all other respects as other public roads.

Laws 1957, c. 155, art. IV, § 31, p. 551.